Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2207
Data collection system.

The department shall establish a data collection system and collect data from participating providers annually. Such data shall be divided by service area and shall include (1) the number of participating children and youth, (2) the ages of the participating children and youth, (3) the duration of each case, and (4) case outcomes, including permanency, guardianship, and family support. Data involving incomplete cases shall be included and identified as such.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 7.